Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. Crimes and Offenses Against Public Utilities

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance specifically criminalizing passenger misconduct on public transportation, 78 ALR4th 1127.

§ 37-12-101.
Stealing railroad equipment.

If any person shall willfully and wrongfully take or remove the waste or packing or brass or brasses from any journal or boxes, of any locomotive, engine, tender, carriage, coach, car, caboose, or truck, used or operated, or capable of being used or operated upon any railroad, whether the same be operated by steam or electricity, the person so offending shall be guilty of a felony, and on conviction shall be sentenced to pay a fine of five hundred dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 14, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5830; C.S. 1920, § 7109; R.S. 1931, § 32-316; C.S. 1945, § 9-1901; W.S. 1957, § 37-239.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to larceny generally, see §

6-3-401

et seq.

§ 37-12-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 55, related to embezzlement of railroad tickets.

§ 37-12-103.
Destruction, obstruction or removal of railroad track or fixtures generally; penalty if death results.

Whoever shall willfully and maliciously remove, break, displace, throw down, destroy or in any manner injure any rail or rails or any part of the tracks or any bridge, viaduct, culvert, trestle-work, embankment, parapet or other fixture or any part thereof, attached to or connected with such tracks of any railroad in this state, in operation, or shall willfully and maliciously place any obstructions upon the rail or rails, track or tracks of any such railroad, or shall willfully and maliciously meddle, tamper, or interfere with the signals or mechanism controlling the signal devices of any such railroad, shall be punished by imprisonment in the penitentiary not less than one (1) year nor more than twenty (20) years; provided, however, if any person shall, by commission of either of the aforesaid offenses occasion the death of any person, or persons, the person or persons so offending shall be deemed guilty of murder in the first or second degree, or manslaughter, according to the nature of the offense, and, on conviction thereof, shall be punished as by law provided.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 96, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 9-1903; W.S. 1957, § 37-241.

Cross references. —

As to homicide generally, see §

6-2-101

et seq.

§ 37-12-104.
Unlawful riding on railroad trains.

It shall be unlawful for any person, without the consent of those operating the same, to ride on any part of any railroad car or train.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 91, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 7267; R.S. 1931, § 32-818; Laws 1943, ch. 5, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 9-1904; W.S. 1957, § 37-242.

§ 37-12-105.
Unlawful riding on railroad trains; penalty.

Every person violating the provisions of 32-818 [§

37-12-104

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not less than five dollars ($5.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not less than ten (10) days, nor more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 91, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 7268; R.S. 1931, § 32-819; Laws 1943, ch. 5, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 9-1905; W.S. 1957, § 37-243.

§ 37-12-106.
Unlawful riding on railroad trains; power of conductor as special constable.

The conductor in charge of any car or train who finds any person on his car or train, violating the provisions of this act [§§

37-12-104

through

37-12-107

], is hereby made a special constable, authorized to arrest any such person and deliver him free of all transportation expense to the first sheriff or deputy sheriff that may be available in the progress of such car or train. Such special constable shall deliver to the sheriff or deputy sheriff with his prisoner a statement in writing showing in a brief and general but not technical way, the offense charged against the prisoner.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 91, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 7269; R.S. 1931, § 32-820; C.S. 1945, § 9-1906; W.S. 1957, § 37-244.

Editor's notes. —

The powers, duties and functions of the office of constable have been transferred to the office of county sheriff. See §§

5-4-401

and

5-4-402

.

§ 37-12-107.
Unlawful riding on railroad trains; prosecution of offender.

Any sheriff or deputy sheriff receiving any person from any special constable, as in this act provided, shall forthwith deliver the person, with the charge made against him to the sheriff of the county wherein the offense may be charged to have been committed. It shall be the duty of the sheriff receiving the prisoner forthwith to deliver to the district attorney for the county, the written charge made against the prisoner by the special constable, and the district attorney shall file with the proper circuit court the proper affidavit charging the prisoner with the offense, and shall diligently prosecute the same.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 91, §§ 4, 5; C.S. 1920, § 7270; R.S. 1931, § 32-821; C.S. 1945, § 9-1907; W.S. 1957, § 37-245; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

The powers, duties and functions of the office of constable have been transferred to the office of county sheriff. See §§

5-4-401

and

5-4-402

.

§§ 37-12-108 through 37-12-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions on aggravated robbery and assault, see §§

6-2-401

and

6-2-502

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1890, ch. 73, §§ 63 to 65, related to attacking a public conveyance, wrecking trains, and entering a train with the intent to commit a felony.

§ 37-12-111.
Gas; interference with pipes.

Any person who connects any pipe or other conduit, device or contrivance with any gas main or lateral supply pipe, supplying or intended to supply gas to any house, store or other building, without the knowledge and consent of any person or corporation owning said gas main or lateral supply pipe, in such manner that any portion of such gas may be transmitted or supplied to any lamp burner, heating apparatus, engine or other instrument or thing by or at which gas is consumed or used, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-114

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 55, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 7114; R.S. 1931, § 32-322; C.S. 1945, § 9-1911; W.S. 1957, § 37-249.

Cross references. —

As to collection for undercharges for electricity and gas where there has not been a willful offense committed by the customer or its agent, see §

37-2-222

.

§ 37-12-112.
Gas; piping gas around meter.

Any person who connects or changes any pipe or other conduit, device or contrivance with any gas main or lateral supply pipe, supplying or intended to supply gas to any house, store or other building, without the knowledge and consent of any person or corporation owning said gas main, or lateral supply pipe, in such manner that any portion of such gas may be transmitted or supplied to any lamp burner, heating apparatus, engine or other instrument or thing by or at which gas is consumed or used, around or without passing through the meter provided for measuring or registering the amount or quantity of gas passing through it, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-114

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 55, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 7115; R.S. 1931, § 32-323; C.S. 1945, § 9-1912; W.S. 1957, § 37-250.

Cited

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 37-12-113.
Gas; alteration or destruction of meter.

Any person who willfully injures, alters, or by any instrument, device or contrivance in any manner interferes with or destroys the action or operation of any meter for measuring gas, or of the amount or quantity of gas passing through it without the knowledge or consent of the person or corporation owning the same shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-114

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 55, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 7116; R.S. 1931, § 32-324; C.S. 1945, § 9-1913; W.S. 1957, § 37-251.

§ 37-12-114.
Gas; penalty.

Any person convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this act [§§

37-12-111

through

37-12-114

] shall be punished for each offense by a fine of not less than fifty ($50.00) dollars nor more than three hundred dollars ($300.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than thirty (30) days or more than ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 55, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 7117; R.S. 1931, § 32-325; C.S. 1945, § 9-1914; W.S. 1957, § 37-252.

§ 37-12-115.
Electricity; interference with wires.

Any person who connects or changes any wire, cord, socket, motor or other instrument, device or contrivance, with any wire transmitting or supplying, or intended to transmit or supply electricity to any house, store or other building, without the knowledge and consent of the person or corporation owning said wire, in such manner that any portion of such electricity may be transmitted or supplied to any globe, lamp, heating apparatus or other instrument by or at which electricity is consumed, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-118

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 59, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 7118; R.S. 1931, § 32-326; C.S. 1945, § 9-1915; W.S. 1957, § 37-253.

Cross references. —

For another provision relating to interference with or injury to electric lines or poles, see §

37-12-120

.

§ 37-12-116.
Electricity; wiring around electric meter.

Any person who connects or changes any wire, cord, socket, motor or other instrument, device, or contrivance with any wire, transmitting or supplying or intended to transmit or supply electricity to any house, store, or other building, without the knowledge and consent of the person or corporation owning said wire, in such manner as to transmit or supply any such electricity to any globe, lamp, heating apparatus or other instrument by or at which electricity is consumed, around or without passing through the meter provided for measuring or registering the amount or quantity of electricity passing through it, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-118

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 59, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 7119; R.S. 1931, § 32-327; C.S. 1945, § 9-1916; W.S. 1957, § 37-254.

§ 37-12-117.
Electricity; alteration or destruction of electric meter.

Any person who willfully injures, alters or by any instrument, device or contrivance in any manner interferes with or obstructs the action or operation of any meter for measuring electricity or the amount or quantity of electricity passing through it without the knowledge and consent of the person or corporation owning said meter, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 4 hereof [§

37-12-118

].

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 59, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 7120; R.S. 1931, § 32-328; C.S. 1945, § 9-1917; W.S. 1957, § 37-255.

§ 37-12-118.
Electricity; penalty.

Any person convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this act [§§

37-12-115

through

37-12-118

], shall be punished for each offense by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than thirty (30) days or more than ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 59, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 7121; R.S. 1931, § 32-329; C.S. 1945, § 9-1918; W.S. 1957, § 37-256.

§ 37-12-119.
Interfering or tampering with petroleum pipeline.

It shall be unlawful for any person, intentionally, knowingly and without lawful right so to do, to tap, tamper with, alter, interfere with or injure any oil well, drip, pipeline, or any other facility used in the production, handling, refining, or transportation of gas, natural gasoline, casinghead gasoline, petroleum, or derivatives or by-products of any of them. Any person found guilty of violating the provisions of this act [section] shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 83, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 9-1919; W.S. 1957, § 37-257.

§ 37-12-120.
Interference with or injury to electric utility poles or wires; affixing posters to telegraph, telephone and electric utility poles prohibited; penalties.

Whoever maliciously or mischievously takes down, removes, interferes with, obstructs or injures any electric utility pole or wire, or any part thereof, or any appurtenance or apparatus connected therewith, or severs or breaks or obstructs any such wire or apparatus or appurtenance is guilty of a malicious trespass.

Whoever affixes any poster, placard, sign, or notice of any kind, to any telegraph, telephone or electric utility pole or wire, or any part thereof, or any appurtenance or apparatus connected thereto is guilty of malicious trespass.

Any person convicted of a malicious trespass as defined in this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 62; R.S. 1899, § 5014; Laws 1901, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5858; C.S. 1920, § 7147; R.S. 1931, § 32-355; C.S. 1945, § 9-1920; W.S. 1957, § 37-258; Laws 1963, ch. 24, § 1.

Cross references. —

For other provisions relating to interference with electric currents, wires, etc., see §§

37-12-115

to

37-12-118

.

§ 37-12-121.
Damaging public telephones or equipment or telegraph or telephone lines or poles.

Any person who willfully displaces, removes, injures or destroys any public telephone instrument or any part thereof or any equipment or facilities associated therewith or who enters or breaks into any coin box associated therewith or who willfully displaces, removes, injures or destroys any telegraph or telephone line, wire, cable, pole or conduit belonging to another or the material or property appurtenant thereto is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for not more than five (5) years, to which may be added a fine not exceeding the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 24, § 2.

Cross references. —

See cross references to §

37-12-120

.

A penal statute cannot be extended by implication or construction

to persons or things not expressly brought within its terms, nor to cases not within the letter of the statute, and all doubts as to the construction are resolved in favor of the defendant. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

Offense is included in larceny. —

A charge of malicious destruction of telephone line under this section is an included offense in a larceny charge under § 6-7-301 of stealing, taking, and carrying away such line. Loddy v. State, 502 P.2d 194,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1972), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 1134, 94 S. Ct. 877, 38 L. Ed. 2d 760, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 1493 (U.S. 1974).

One element is property must belong to another. —

One of the elements of the offense under this section is that the property must be property “belonging to another.” Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

And section does not apply if it belongs to defendant. —

If the telephone and the appurtenances were property “belonging to” the defendant, then they could not be property “belonging to another” for purposes of applying this section. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

The clear language of this section would indicate that if the property can be said to have belonged to defendant, he cannot be convicted of a violation of the section. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

In order to make out a violation of this section, it is incumbent upon the state to prove that the defendant had no interest whatsoever in the telephone equipment which would permit it to be described as “belonging to” the defendant. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

“Belong” may mean less than absolute title. —

The word “belong” is said to have 2 general meanings: (1) ownership; and (2) less than ownership, i.e., less than an unqualified and absolute title, such as the absolute right of user. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

Right of user makes property belong to defendant. —

There is inherent ambiguity in the words, “belonging to,” and these words, therefore, are to be given the meaning most favorable to the defendant. The most favorable meaning to him is that the words “belonging to” mean something less than an unqualified and absolute title or ownership such as “the absolute right of user.” Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

Interest of subscriber. —

Until he orders the telephone disconnected, a subscriber has an interest which permits the telephone to be described as belonging to him. That interest may be affected by his demand upon the telephone company that it be disconnected, but until that demand is compiled with, he, at the very least, is an involuntary bailee. In the role of an involuntary bailee he still has a right to possess the property as against everyone except the telephone company, its owner. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

A private telephone and telephone equipment on private property belongs to the owner

of the property insofar as he has exclusive rights to possess and use the telephone and equipment. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

Individual may interrupt his own telephone service. —

Telephones customarily are relied upon for all sorts of communicative uses including those made necessary because of emergencies. To permit strangers to interrupt telephone service could create grave dangers in many instances. On the other hand, if an individual chooses, for whatever reason, to interrupt his own telephone service, that act should not necessarily invoke the same criminal sanction, and it does not. Horn v. State, 556 P.2d 925,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 37-12-122.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 121, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1893, ch. 12, § 1, related to cutting, breaking, tapping or otherwise intercepting telegraph or telephone line communications.

§ 37-12-123.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

6-3-409

by Laws 1983, ch. 171, § 5.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to fraudulently obtaining telecommunications services, see §

6-3-409

.

§ 37-12-124.
Sale of equipment designed to conceal source or avoid charges for telecommunication service; prohibited.

Any individual, corporation or other person who under circumstances evincing an intent to defraud, makes, possesses, sells, gives, or otherwise transfers to another, or who offers or advertises for sale, any instrument, apparatus, equipment or device, or any plans or instructions for making or assembling the same, and which is designed or adapted, or which can be used:

To fraudulently avoid the lawful charge for any telecommunication service in violation of section 1, chapter 126, Session Laws of Wyoming 1961 [§

6-3-409

]; or,

To conceal, or to assist another to conceal, from any supplier of telecommunication service or from any lawful authority, the existence or place of origin or of destination of any telecommunication, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 234, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-12-125.
Sale of equipment designed to conceal source or avoid charges for telecommunication service; exemption.

Nothing herein shall apply to holders of valid federal communications commission licenses when the licensee is acting within the scope of his license; provided that nothing herein shall excuse any person from compliance with lawful tariffs of any telecommunications company.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 234, § 2.

Cited

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 37-12-126.
Failure to yield telephone for reporting emergencies; definitions.

In W.S.

37-12-126

through

37-12-130

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Party line” means a subscriber’s line telephone circuit, consisting of two (2) or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number;

“Emergency” means a situation in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 89, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

37-12-126

through

37-12-130

” for “this section” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 37-12-127.
Failure to yield telephone for reporting emergencies; misdemeanor; exception.

Any person who willfully refuses to yield or surrender the use of a party line or a public pay telephone to another person for the purpose of permitting such other person to report a fire or summon police, medical or other aid in case of emergency, is guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not apply to persons using a party line for such an emergency call.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 89, § 2.

§ 37-12-128.
Failure to yield telephone for reporting emergencies; pretext that emergency exists.

Any person who asks for or requests the use of a party line or a public pay telephone on the pretext that an emergency exists, knowing that no emergency in fact exists, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 89, § 3.

§ 37-12-129.
Failure to yield telephone for reporting emergencies; defense.

It is a defense to prosecution under this act [§§

37-12-126

through

37-12-130

] that the accused did not know or did not have reason to know of the emergency in question, or that the accused was himself using the telephone party line or public pay telephone for such an emergency call.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 89, § 4.

§ 37-12-130.
Failure to yield telephone for reporting emergencies; notice in telephone directories.

Every telephone directory published after the effective date of this act and which is distributed to the members of the general public of this state shall contain, in a prominent place, a notice which explains the offenses provided in this act [§§

37-12-126

through

37-12-130

]. The provisions of this section shall not apply to those directories distributed solely for public advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 89, § 5.